apertium-mt-he.mt.dix
  <pardef n="laħ/am__n_m">
    <e><p><l>am</l><r>am<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>mijiet</l><r>am<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="xir/ja__n_f">
    <e><p><l>ja</l><r>ja<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>i</l><r>ja<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="col"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>jiet</l><r>ja<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <!-- SECTION: Proper nouns -->

  <pardef n="Malta__np">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="Tibet__np">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="Cervantes__np">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="San__np">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="Mikiel__np">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="Marija__np">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <!-- SECTION: Adjectives -->

  <pardef n="akbar__adj">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="Ewrope/w__adj">
    <e><p><l>w</l><r>w<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a</l><r>w<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>ja</l><r>w<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>j</l><r>w<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="teknoloġi/ku__adj">
    <e><p><l>ku</l><r>ku<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ka</l><r>ku<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ċi</l><r>ku<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="taj/jeb__adj">
    <e><p><l>jeb</l><r>jeb<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ba</l><r>jeb<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>bin</l><r>jeb<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="mej/jet__adj">
    <e><p><l>jet</l><r>jet<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ta</l><r>jet<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>tin</l><r>jet<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="ċert/u__adj">
    <e><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="kb/ir__adj">
    <e><p><l>ir</l><r>ir<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ira</l><r>ir<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ar</l><r>ir<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="x/iħ__adj">
    <e><p><l>iħ</l><r>iħ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>iħa</l><r>iħ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>juħ</l><r>iħ<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="nativ__adj"> <!-- TODO: check -->
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="ħ/ażin__adj">
    <e><p><l>ażin</l><r>ażin<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ażina</l><r>ażin<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>żiena</l><r>ażin<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="wiesgħ/a__adj">
    <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>in</l><r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="barran__adj">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>in</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="Malti__adj">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ja</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>n</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="kollha__adj">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="kwadr/u__adj">
    <e><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>i</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="epi/ku__adj">
    <e><p><l>ku</l><r>ku<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ka</l><r>ku<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ċi</l><r>ku<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="differenti__adj">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="nazzjonalista__adj">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="eminent__adj">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="għol/i__adj">
    <e><p>          <l>i</l><r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p>          <l>ja</l><r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p>          <l>jin</l><r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="barrani__adj">
    <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p>          <l>ja</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p>          <l>n</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="maħmuġ__adj">
    <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p>          <l>a</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p>          <l>in</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="miel/aħ__adj">
    <e><p>          <l>aħ</l><r>aħ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p>          <l>ħa</l><r>aħ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p>          <l>ħa</l><r>aħ<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="/iswed__adj">
    <e><p>          <l>iswed</l><r>iswed<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p>          <l>sewda</l><r>iswed<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p>          <l>suwed</l><r>iswed<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="tq/il__adj">
    <e><p>          <l>il</l><r>il<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p>          <l>ila</l><r>il<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p>          <l>al</l><r>il<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="n/adif__adj">
    <e><p>          <l>adif</l><r>adif<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p>          <l>adifa</l><r>adif<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p>          <l>odfa</l><r>adif<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p>          <l>daf</l><r>adif<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="vojt__adj">
    <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p>          <l>a</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p>          <l>a</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ħ/afif__adj">
    <e><p>          <l>afif</l><r>afif<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p>          <l>afifa</l><r>afif<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p>          <l>fief</l><r>afif<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

    <e lm="Danimarka"><i>Danimarka</i><par n="Malta__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Spanja"><i>Spanja</i><par n="Malta__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Il-Kappara"><i>Il-Kappara</i><par n="Malta__np"/></e>
    <e lm="York"><i>York</i><par n="Tibet__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Is-Siġġiewi"><i>Is-Siġġiewi</i><par n="Tibet__np"/></e>
    <e lm="San Tumas"><i>San<b/>Tumas</i><par n="Tibet__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Julia"><i>Julia</i><par n="Marija__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Sophie"><i>Sophie</i><par n="Marija__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Karol"><i>Karol</i><par n="Marija__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Karlu"><i>Karlu</i><par n="Mikiel__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Clemente"><i>Clemente</i><par n="Mikiel__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Carmelo"><i>Carmelo</i><par n="Mikiel__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Artell"><i>Artell</i><par n="Cervantes__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Dirac"><i>Dirac</i><par n="Cervantes__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Scholes"><i>Scholes</i><par n="Cervantes__np"/></e>
    <e lm="laħam" c="meat"><i>laħ</i><par n="laħ/am__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="xirja" c="shopping"><i>xir</i><par n="xir/ja__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Sir"><i>Sir</i><par n="San__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Facebook"><i>Facebook</i><par n="San__np"/></e>
    <e lm="UE"><i>UE</i><par n="San__np"/></e>
    <e lm="kollha"><i>kollha</i><par n="kollha__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="istess"><i>istess</i><par n="kollha__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="xiħ" c="old person"><i>x</i><par n="x/iħ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="żgħir"><i>żgħ</i><par n="kb/ir__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="fqir"><p><l>ifqar</l><r>fqir</r></p><par n="akbar__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tajjeb" c="good"><i>taj</i><par n="taj/jeb__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tajjeb" r="LR"><p><l>itjeb</l><r>tajjeb</r></p><par n="akbar__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mejjet" c="dead"><i>mej</i><par n="mej/jet__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ċertu" c="certain"><i>ċert</i><par n="ċert/u__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Ewropew"><i>Ewrope</i><par n="Ewrope/w__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="astronomiku"><i>astronomi</i><par n="teknoloġi/ku__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ġeografiku"><i>ġeografi</i><par n="teknoloġi/ku__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="iżlamiku"><i>iżlami</i><par n="teknoloġi/ku__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="permanent"><i>permanent</i><par n="eminent__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="imminent"><i>imminent</i><par n="eminent__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Malti"><i>Malti</i><par n="Malti__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="għarbi" c="Arab"><i>għarbi</i><par n="Malti__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="barran"><i>barran</i><par n="barran__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="wiesgħa"><i>wiesgħ</i><par n="wiesgħ/a__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ħajj"><i>ħajj</i><par n="barran__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="proprju"><i>proprj</i><par n="kwadr/u__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="serju" c="serious"><i>serj</i><par n="kwadr/u__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="barrani"><i>barrani</i><par n="barrani__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="għoli"><i>għol</i><par n="għol/i__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ħażin"><i>ħ</i><par n="ħ/ażin__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ħażin" r="LR"><p><l>eħżen</l><r>ħażin</r></p><par n="akbar__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="iswed" c="black"><i></i><par n="/iswed__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mielaħ"><i>miel</i><par n="miel/aħ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mudlam"><i>mudlam</i><par n="vojt__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="nadif" c="clean"><i>n</i><par n="n/adif__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="magħruf" c="famous"><i>magħruf</i><par n="maħmuġ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="qaddis" c="holy"><i>qaddis</i><par n="maħmuġ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="twil"><i>tw</i><par n="tq/il__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vojt"><i>vojt</i><par n="vojt__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ħafif"><i>ħ</i><par n="ħ/afif__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kompless" r="LR"><p><l>kompless</l><r>kumpless</r></p><par n="nativ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="fatali"><i>fatali</i><par n="differenti__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="possibbli"><i>possibbli</i><par n="differenti__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Laburista"><i>Laburista</i><par n="nazzjonalista__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="professjonist"><i>professjonista</i><par n="nazzjonalista__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="żgħir" c="small" ><i>żgħ</i><par n="kb/ir__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="twil" c="tall" ><i>tw</i><par n="tq/il__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="konservattiv"><i>konservattiv</i><par n="nativ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tragiku"><i>tragi</i><par n="epi/ku__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="farmaċewtiku"><i>farmaċewti</i><par n="epi/ku__adj"/></e>
